Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Mississippi Central Market Board.

§ 69-7-101.
Central Market Board created.

For the purpose of aiding, establishing and providing proper facilities for the efficient handling of farm and other food products in the interest of farmer, consumer, the general public and the State of Mississippi, and to assist in the disposal and sale of such products, there is hereby created a Mississippi Central Market Board, hereinafter referred to as the “board.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-31; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 1.

§ 69-7-103.
Members; appointment and term of office.

The board shall consist of the State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, who shall be a member and ex officio chairman thereof, and four other members to be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be from each highway commissioner’s district and the fourth member from the state at large, all of whom shall be qualified electors of the State of Mississippi, one of whom shall be a wholesale groceryman dealing in fruits and vegetables, one a retail groceryman dealing in fruits and vegetables, one a farmer growing fruits and/or vegetables, and one a farmer producing poultry and eggs. In making the first appointments, the term of office of the farmer producing poultry and eggs shall be appointed for one year, the retail groceryman dealing in fruits and vegetables shall be appointed for two years, the farmer growing fruits and/or vegetables shall be appointed for three years, and the wholesale groceryman dealing in fruits and vegetables shall be for four years, and each of the successors shall thereafter be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-32; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 2.

§ 69-7-105.
Meetings of the board; compensation of members.

The board shall meet at least once each quarter during the fiscal year and at such other times and places as it may adopt by rule or regulation, and may be called in special session upon notice mailed by the secretary not less than seven (7) days prior to the date of the meeting, but this requirement as to notice may be waived by consent of all members of the board. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and each member attending any meeting shall receive a per diem as is provided by Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for each day, or part of a day, for each meeting, and actual expenses incurred attending meetings, except the commissioner of agriculture and commerce who shall receive no compensation for attending meetings.

No member of the board shall draw in salary and expenses a sum in excess of Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) in any fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-36; Laws, 1946, ch. 177. § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 69-7-107.
Headquarters; organization.

The board shall be domiciled at or near Jackson, Mississippi, and shall hold its first meeting in the office of the State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, within ten days after the members have qualified for office by taking the oath of office as required by the constitution and filing the same in the office of the Secretary of State, for the purpose of organizing the board and adopting such rules and regulations for the future activities hereunder as may be necessary and proper to carry out the terms and provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-33; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 3.

§ 69-7-109.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall have the power to:

Fix salaries of any authorized employees of the market;

Fix rentals and charges for each type of facility constructed in the market, taking into consideration the cost of such facility, the interest and amortization period required, a proper relationship between types of operators in the market, cost of operation, and the need for reasonable reserves, expansion and the like;

Make investigations and hold hearings and conferences necessary to formulate and adopt a financial building and operating program for a market and make revisions from time to time;

Make rules and regulations which shall govern all such business and all persons and vehicles coming upon the market;

Provide and enforce penalties and liquidated damages relative to breaches of such rules and regulations and any contracts entered into;

Lease the buildings and facilities to farmers, wholesale dealers and other persons engaged in the wholesale marketing of perishable farm products;

Determine and set the hours when the market may open and close during any day or night throughout the year;

Plan, build, construct or cause to be built or constructed, or lease any facilities, on the grounds under the control of the Mississippi Central Market Board, that are deemed necessary for the successful operation of a wholesale market for farm products;

Rent or lease any necessary property, real or personal, on the grounds under the control of the Mississippi Central Market Board, as may be deemed advisable by the board for the successful operation of the market. However, that before leasing or renting any property for use as a filling station or the sale of similar supplies and accessories, the board shall advertise and receive sealed bids therefor, and shall have the power to reject any and all of such bids, or to accept the highest and best bid made therefor, and the lessee shall erect such buildings and add such facilities as necessary to carry out the provisions of this article at the expense of the lessee in addition to any other monies paid as lease money to said board for the purpose of operating a service station. Such establishment shall not be tax exempt. No filling station shall be leased for a monthly rental less than One Cent (1¢) per gallon for each gallon of gasoline sold.

Employ an attorney as prescribed in Section 69-1-14.

The said board shall also have full power and authority to rent or lease real property, on the grounds under the control of the Mississippi Central Market Board, not otherwise used, for a period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years to private concerns for the purpose of processing agricultural products, and providing such facilities found necessary by the board to carry out the purposes of this article, and such facilities, structures, buildings, or other improvements erected or placed thereon by private concerns shall be subject to taxation the same as private property, provided, however, that improvements or facilities erected thereon for processing agricultural products shall not be assessed or taxed until five (5) years after completion of construction. The improvements and facilities erected on said leased property shall be liable for ad valorem taxes and shall be assessed and levied against said leasehold separately from the fee of said lands, and upon failure to pay taxes upon same when due, said facilities and improvements shall be sold by the tax collector as other property is sold for the nonpayment of taxes, but only such rights of the lessee under said lease contract shall be so sold. Upon the failure to pay taxes promptly when due on said lease, said board shall have the power to cancel and terminate said lease immediately and shall thereupon be authorized to lease or re-lease same to another private individual or concern as herein provided.

The provisions hereof regarding taxation shall not apply to those buildings, structures and facilities erected on said property by the board.

The central market board shall maintain or operate local market, after the local board or members of any local market have voted to transfer its activity to the state market board. However, such local market shall be in the sale of produce or farm products, and the central market board shall not be required to assume any outstanding indebtedness in connection with the acquisition of such local market facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-37; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 7; Laws, 1948, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 152; Laws, 1983, ch. 365, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 69-7-111.
State market manager; bond, duties, compensation.

The board is authorized to select an executive officer to be known as the state market manager, who shall have the ability to operate a large business and who shall have a knowledge of the problems of the growers and distributors and have had experience in the marketing of perishable vegetables. It shall be the duty of the state market manager to manage and control such market as may be established hereunder, subject to the supervision of the board, and to employ, subject to the approval of the board, such employees as may be necessary for the efficient and economical operation and maintenance of such market. The state market manager shall receive such salary as may be fixed by the Legislature, and shall devote his entire time and attention to the discharge of his duties as such manager. He shall attend all meetings of the board and be the secretary thereof and keep the minutes thereof, and shall have custody of its books, records, papers and accounts. The state market manager shall, before assuming the duties of his office, enter into a bond in the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) payable to the State of Mississippi conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-34; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 69-7-113.
State market manager to keep records and make reports.

The market manager shall keep, or have kept, records of all leases, rentals, sales, and expense items which shall be audited as other state records are audited. And he shall make, or cause to be made, a report of receipts and disbursements and other information pertaining to the operations of the market to each regular session of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-40; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 10.

§ 69-7-115.
Acquisition of facilities, equipment, etc.

The board is hereby authorized subject to the approval of the building commission to acquire by purchase, donation, lease or condemnation, and for and in the name of the State of Mississippi, a suitable site or sites, accessible to highways and railroads and air terminal facilities, and to erect and install thereon such structures, facilities, and equipment as may be necessary for the inspection, grading, standardization, classification, refrigeration, processing and marketing of such products (for both food and feed), within the amount appropriated for such purposes by the Legislature and subject to the approval of the building commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-35; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 5.

§ 69-7-117.
Management and disposition of property.

The Mississippi Central Market Board is authorized and empowered to assume jurisdiction of, and to administer any properties that may be acquired by the State of Mississippi for the use and benefit of said Mississippi Central Market Board, located at Prairie, Monroe County, Mississippi, and to administer the affairs of said properties in accordance with the authority conferred on said Mississippi Central Market Board by this article.

The Mississippi Central Market Board is hereby authorized and empowered to lease, or rent, to any corporation, individual, partnership, municipality, county or political subdivision thereof, any part of the property under their jurisdiction, or which may hereafter come under their jurisdiction, located at Prairie, Monroe County, Mississippi, that cannot be used for the purposes as set forth in this article.

The funds derived from any lease, or rental contract entered into under authority of this section shall be placed in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund of the state.

The Mississippi Central Market Board shall not enter into any lease, or rental contract under authority of this section, until such lease, or rental contract has first been approved by the Agricultural and Industrial Board, and their approval of same entered upon their minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-35.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 196, §§ 1-4.

§ 69-7-119.
Limitation on powers of board.

The board shall not have the power to:

acquire, construct, maintain or operate any market or facility which is not operated primarily for the purpose of purchasing and selling at wholesale;

engage in the purchase or sale of farm produce, except the leasing as a grower or produce dealer of a stall or store upon the market and such transactions as are ordinarily incidental thereto and at the same rental as like businesses pay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-38; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 8.

§ 69-7-121.
Central market fund.

All funds collected under this article shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of Central Market Fund and shall be used solely for payment of the expenses of operation and maintenance of such market and facilities including the acquisition, leasing, maintenance and operation of local farm market facilities located at other points in the State of Mississippi as provided for herein, and for the employment of such production and marketing personnel as will, in the discretion of the Central Market Board, more effectively promote the operation of such market, on warrants issued according to law pursuant to payment vouchers signed by the chairman or his designee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-39; Laws, 1946, ch. 177, § 9; Laws, 1954, ch. 152, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 342; Laws, 1991, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.